Virginia statutes. Title 66. Juvenile Justice.
Chapter 2. Care of Children Committed to Department.

§ 66-13.
Authority of Department as to juveniles committed to it; establishment of facilities; arrangements for temporary care.

The Department is authorized and empowered to receive juveniles committed to it by the courts of the Commonwealth. The Department shall establish, staff and maintain facilities for the rehabilitation, education, training and confinement of such juveniles. The Department may make arrangements with satisfactory persons, institutions or agencies, or with cities or counties maintaining places of detention for juveniles, for the temporary care of such juveniles.

The Department may by mutual agreement with a locality or localities and, pursuant to standards promulgated pursuant to § 16.1-309.9, establish detention homes for use by a locality or localities for pre-trial and post-dispositional detention pursuant to §§ 16.1-248.1 and 16.1-284.1. The Department may collect by mutual agreement with a locality or localities and from any locality of this Commonwealth from which a juvenile is placed in such a detention home, the reasonable cost of maintaining such juvenile in such facility and a portion of the cost of construction of such facility. Such agreements shall be subject to approval by the General Assembly in the general appropriation act.

The Department shall collect data pertaining to the demographic characteristics of juveniles incarcerated in state juvenile correctional institutions, including, but not limited to, the race or ethnicity, age, and gender of such persons, and the types of and extent to which health-related problems are prevalent among such persons. Beginning July 1, 1997, such data shall be collected, tabulated quarterly, and reported by the Director to the Governor and the General Assembly at each regular session of the General Assembly thereafter.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-324, 53-330, 63-291, 63-366, 63-367, 63-368, 63-369, 63.1-239, 63.1-245; 1950, p. 33; 1954, c. 262; 1956, cc. 127, 287; 1962, c. 437; 1968, c. 578; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1975, c. 178; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, §

53.1-237

; 1989, c. 733; 1991, c. 534; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 894; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2022, cc. 414, 415.

Cross references.

As to delinquent juveniles generally, see § 16.1-278.8.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1996, cc. 755 and
914, cls. 6, provide: “[t]hat no later than October 1, 1996, the Board of Juvenile Justice Services shall establish length-of-stay guidelines for juveniles indeterminately committed to the Department. By November 1, 1996, and annually thereafter, the Department shall provide copies of the guidelines and the estimated impact on juvenile correctional facility bed space needs to the General Assembly.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and in subsection A, in the second sentence, added “education”; and in subsection B, in the first sentence, deleted “of this title” following “(§

66-25.3

et seq.),” and in the last sentence, substituted “The Department of Juvenile Justice’s Division of Education” for “The Department of Correctional Education” and “§

66-13

” for “Chapter 18 (§ 22.1-339 et seq.) of Title 22.1.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 414 and 415 are identical, and deleted former subsection B, which read: “In accordance with the Juvenile Corrections Private Management Act, Chapter 2.1 (§

66-25.3

et seq.), the Department may establish, or contract with private entities, political subdivisions or commissions to establish, juvenile boot camps. The Board shall prescribe standards for the development, implementation and operation of the boot camps with highly structured components including, but not limited to, military style drill and ceremony, physical labor, education and rigid discipline and no less than six months of intensive aftercare. The Department of Juvenile Justice’s Division of Education shall establish, staff, and maintain educational programs for such juveniles in accordance with §

66-13

. A contract to expend state funds to establish a facility for a juvenile boot camp shall not be executed by the Department unless an appropriation has been expressly approved as is otherwise provided by law”; and redesignated accordingly.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2603 Assessment Order — Juvenile Boot Camp.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants, § 81.

§ 66-13.1.
Division of Education; employment of Superintendent; powers and duties.

To assist in the performance of the duties imposed by §

66-13

the Department shall develop and maintain a Division of Education (Division), which shall be composed of all the educational facilities of all institutions operated by the Department. The Division shall be designated as a local education agency (LEA) but shall not be eligible to receive state funds appropriated for direct aid to public education.

The Department shall employ a Superintendent of the Division, who shall meet the minimum standards for division superintendents set by the Board of Education. The Superintendent shall supervise the administration of the Division. The Department shall employ teachers and place them in appropriate schools. Other powers and duties of the Superintendent shall be fixed by the Board of Education in accordance with law.

When the Department employs a teacher licensed by the Board of Education to provide instruction in the schools of the juvenile correctional centers, the Department of Human Resource Management shall establish salary schedules for the teachers which endeavor to be competitive with those in effect for the school division in which the correctional center is located.

History.

2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, enacted this section.

§ 66-14.
Allowance for maintenance of children placed by Commonwealth in private homes, etc.

For the maintenance of each child committed to the custody of the Department pursuant to subdivision A 14 of § 16.1-278.8 and placed in a private home or in a facility other than one operated by the Commonwealth, there shall be paid a per diem allowance which shall be established by the Department from funds appropriated to the Department for this purpose. The cost of such care shall not exceed that amount which would be incurred if the services required by the child were provided in a juvenile facility operated by the Department.

No child shall be placed outside the Commonwealth without first complying with the appropriate provisions of Chapters 10 (§

63.2-1000

et seq.) and 11 (§

63.2-1100

et seq.) of Title 63.2 or with regulations of the State Board of Social Services relating to resident children placed out of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-325, 63-293, 63.1-240; 1952, c. 644; 1962, c. 437; 1968, c. 578; 1970, c. 326; 1974, cc. 44, 45, 476; 1978, c. 309; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-239; 1989, c. 733; 1992, cc. 837, 880; 1993, cc. 232, 283; 1996, cc. 587, 597.

Cross references.

As to the establishment of a state pool of funds to be allocated to community policy and management teams under the Children’s Services Act, see §

2.2-5211

.

§ 66-15.
Schedules of per diem cost of maintenance in detention homes; reimbursements of cities and counties.

The Department shall establish schedules setting forth the per diem cost to each locality for maintaining a child in a detention home.
In accordance with the schedule, the Department, in addition to all other reimbursements on account of such detention homes, shall reimburse each city or county for the cost of maintaining in such homes any children committed to the Department. The Department shall review annually and adjust, if justified, the per diem it pays to localities for the care of state wards.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-326, 63.1-241, 63-293.1; 1954, c. 582; 1968, c. 578; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-240; 1989, cc. 683, 733.

§ 66-16.
Acceptance and expenditure of certain funds for children committed to Department.

The Department is authorized to accept and expend for the benefit of any child committed to it, or for reimbursement purposes, any funds made available from any source, solely for the current maintenance and support of any such child, whether such funds be provided by the child’s parents, or other person, or by the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, the Railroad Retirement Act, the old age and survivor’s insurance provisions of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, or from any other source.
In no event shall the sums so accepted exceed an amount in excess of the cost to the Department of supporting the child.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-327, 63.1-242, 63-293.2; 1956, c. 400; 1968, c. 578; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-241; 1989, c. 733.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs” was substituted for “Veterans Administration.”

§ 66-17.
Disposition of property left by child.

If any child, having been in the custody of the Department by virtue of § 16.1-278.8, upon being released or having escaped therefrom leaves any personal property valued at less than $100 in the custody of the Department for six months after his release or escape, the Director may sell such personal property at public sale or otherwise dispose of the property. The proceeds of such sale shall be kept for one year from the date of the child’s attaining the age of majority. Thereafter, any unclaimed proceeds shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Literary Fund.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 16.1-178.1, 53-327.1; 1956, c. 555; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1977, c. 559; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-242; 1989, c. 733; 1991, c. 534.

§ 66-18.
Examination and placing of such children.

The Department shall make a careful physical and mental examination of every child committed to it by the courts, investigate the personal and family history of the child and his environment, and place such children at such facilities as are available. Any children committed to the Department and afterwards found to be eligible for commitment by proper proceedings to any state hospital or admission to a training center for individuals with intellectual disability shall take precedence as to admission over all others and shall in all cases be received into the state hospital or training center within 45 days.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-328, 63-292, 63.1-243; 1956, c. 127; 1968, c. 578; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-243; 1989, c. 733; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals with intellectual disability” for “the mentally retarded” and “45” for “forty-five” in the second sentence.

§ 66-19.
Behavioral services unit; director and personnel; examination of children.

To assist in the performance of the duties imposed by §

66-18

, the Department shall maintain a behavioral services unit and employ as director thereof a clinically competent person. The Department shall also employ such other medical, technical and clinical personnel skilled in the diagnosis and treatment of physical diseases or mental illnesses of children as may be desirable for the operation of such unit. The personnel of the unit, when visiting the various facilities maintained by the Department for the care of children committed to the Department, shall conduct a thorough examination of each child at such facilities not theretofore examined by the unit, and other children at the facilities for whom such examination is indicated. Such examination shall be for the purpose of determining, diagnosing and treating physical and learning ailments or impairments and mental illnesses with a view to improving the general functioning of such children and hastening their rehabilitation.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-329, 63.1-244, 63-381, 63-384; 1954, c. 681; 1966, c. 354; 1968, c. 578; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-244; 1989, c. 733; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “physical diseases or mental illnesses” for “physical and mental diseases” in the second sentence and “physical and learning ailments or impairments and mental illnesses” for “physical, mental and learning ailments or impairments” in the fourth sentence.

§ 66-20.
Observation and treatment of children with mental illness or developmental disabilities.

After commitment of any child to the Department, if the Department finds, as a result of psychiatric examinations and case study, that such child has mental illness or a developmental disability, it shall be the duty of the Department to obtain treatment for the child’s mental condition. If the Department determines that transfer to a state hospital, training center, or other appropriate treatment facility is required to further diagnose or treat the child’s mental condition, the proceedings shall be in accordance with the provisions of §

37.2-806

or §§ 16.1-341 through 16.1-345, except that provisions requiring consent of the child’s parent or guardian for treatment shall not apply in such cases. No child transferred to a state hospital pursuant to this section or the provisions of Title 37.2 shall, however, be held or cared for in any maximum security unit where adults determined to be criminally insane reside and such child shall be kept separate and apart from such adults.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-329.1; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 739; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-245; 1989, c. 733; 1990, c. 975; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2017, c. 458.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “has mental illness or intellectual disability” for “is mentally ill or mentally retarded” in the first sentence.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 458 substituted “a developmental disability” for “intellectual disability” in the first sentence.

§ 66-21.
Superintendents and agents of facilities to have powers of sheriff.

The superintendents of the facilities established by the Department pursuant to §

66-13

and their authorized agents shall have the powers of a sheriff for the purpose of preserving order at their facilities and for the conveyance of children committed to their care to and from such facilities.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-332, 63-371, 63.1-247; 1968, c. 578; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-246; 1989, c. 733.

§ 66-22.
Daily and additional allowance to children.

The Director may allow every child in any facility established by the Department a daily allowance in an amount established by the Board. Additional allowance may be made by the Director to provide necessary funds for incidental needs for required activities in schools, foster care and other special placements for other special activities that such children would normally be engaged in resulting from their placement. The allowance so made may be drawn upon by the child for such purposes as may be authorized by the regulations of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-333, 63.1-248, 63-369.1; 1958, c. 366; 1960, c. 395; 1968, c. 578; 1970, c. 327; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1975, c. 638; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-247; 1989, c. 733.

§ 66-22.1.
Establishment of stores in juvenile correctional facilities.

The Director is hereby authorized to provide for the establishment and operation of stores or commissaries in state juvenile correctional facilities to deal in such articles as he deems proper. The profits from the operation of such stores shall be used for educational, recreational, or other purposes beneficial to the juveniles committed to the Department as may be prescribed by the Director.

History.

1997, c. 195.

§ 66-23.
Authority of superintendents with regard to application for operator’s licenses and employment certificates.

The superintendents of facilities established by the Department shall have the authority, commensurate with that of a parent in like cases, to give consent for those children placed in their respective facilities to (i) application for a motor vehicle operator’s license and (ii) issuance of an employment certificate.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-334; 1977, c. 643; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-248; 1989, c. 733; 2012, cc. 164, 456.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 164 and 456 are identical, and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Such authority shall be exercised in accordance with regulations established by the Board.”

§ 66-24.
Community group homes and other residential facilities for certain juveniles; licensure; personnel; summary suspension under certain circumstances; penalty.

The Department of Juvenile Justice shall cooperate with other state departments in fulfilling their respective licensing and certification responsibilities of children’s residential facilities. The Board shall promulgate regulations that shall allow the Department to so assist and cooperate with other state departments. The Board’s regulations shall establish the Department as the single licensing agency, with the exception of educational programs licensed by the Department of Education, for group homes or residential facilities providing care of juveniles in direct state care.

The Department is authorized to establish and maintain such a system of community group homes or other residential care facilities as the Department may from time to time acquire, construct, contract for or rent for the care of juveniles in direct state care, pending development of more permanent placement plans. Any community group home or other residential care facility that the Department may contract for or rent for the care of juveniles in direct state care shall be licensed or certified in accordance with the regulations of the Board.Any more permanent placement plans shall consider adequate care and treatment, and suitable education, training and employment for such juveniles, as is appropriate.

The Department is further authorized to employ necessary personnel for community group homes or other residential care facilities or to contract with private entities for their operation. The Department shall conduct background checks of any individual who (i) accepts a position of employment at a community group home or other residential care facility, (ii) volunteers at a community group home or other residential care facility on a regular basis and will be alone with a juvenile in the performance of his duties, or (iii) provides contractual services directly to a juvenile in a community group home or other residential care facility on a regular basis and will be alone with a juvenile in the performance of his duties, pursuant to §

63.2-1726

.

The Board shall promulgate regulations for licensure or certification of community group homes or other residential care facilities that contract with or are rented for the care of juveniles in direct state care pursuant to subsection B.The Board’s regulations shall address the services required to be provided in such facilities as it may deem appropriate to ensure the welfare and safety of the juveniles. In addition, the Board’s regulations shall include, but need not be limited to (i) specifications for the structure and accommodations of such facilities according to the needs of the juveniles to be placed in the home or facility; (ii) rules concerning allowable activities, local government- and group home- or residential care facility-imposed curfews, and study, recreational, and bedtime hours; and (iii) a requirement that each home or facility have a community liaison who shall be responsible for facilitating cooperative relationships with the neighbors, the school system, local law enforcement, local government officials, and the community at large.

Pursuant to the procedures set forth in subsection F and in addition to any other legally authorized disciplinary actions, the Director may issue a summary order of suspension of the license or certificate of any group home or residential facility so regulated by the Department, in conjunction with any proceeding for revocation, denial, or other action, when conditions or practices exist in the home or facility that pose an immediate and substantial threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the juveniles who are residents and the Director believes the operation of the home or facility should be suspended during the pendency of such proceeding.

The summary order of suspension shall take effect upon its issuance and shall be served on the licensee or certificate holder or its designee as soon as practicable thereafter by personal service and certified mail, return receipt requested, to the address of record of the licensee or certificate holder. The order shall state the time, date, and location of a hearing to determine whether the suspension is appropriate. Such hearing shall be held no later than three business days after the issuance of the summary order of suspension and shall be convened by the Director or his designee.After such hearing, the Director may issue a final order of summary suspension or may find that such summary suspension is not warranted by the facts and circumstances presented. A final order of summary suspension shall include notice that the licensee or certificate holder may appeal the Director’s decision to the appropriate circuit court no later than 10 days following issuance of the order. The sole issue before the court shall be whether the Director had reasonable grounds to require the licensee to cease operations during the pendency of the concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding. The concurrent revocation, denial, or other proceeding shall not be affected by the outcome of any hearing on the appropriateness of the summary suspension.The willful and material failure to comply with the summary order of suspension or final order of summary suspension shall be punishable as a Class 2 misdemeanor. The Director may require the cooperation of any other agency or subdivision of the Commonwealth in the relocation of the juveniles who are residents of a home or facility whose license or certificate has been summarily suspended pursuant to this section and in any other actions necessary to reduce the risk of further harm to such residents.

In addition to the requirements set forth above, the Board’s regulations shall require, as a condition of initial licensure or, if appropriate, license renewal, that the applicant shall: (i) be personally interviewed by Department personnel to determine the qualifications of the owner or operator before granting an initial license; (ii) provide evidence of having relevant prior experience before any initial license is granted; (iii) provide, as a condition of initial license or renewal licensure, evidence of staff participation in training on appropriate siting of the residential facilities for children, good neighbor policies, and community relations; and (iv) be required to screen residents prior to admission to exclude individuals with behavioral issues, such as histories of violence, that cannot be managed in the relevant residential facility.

In addition, the Department shall:

Notify relevant local governments and placing and funding agencies, including the Office of Children’s Services, of multiple health and safety or human rights violations in residential facilities licensed by the Department when such violations result in the lowering of the licensure or certification status of the facility to provisional;

Post on the Department’s website information concerning the application for initial licensure or certification of or renewal, denial, or provisional licensure or certification of any residential facility for children located in the locality;

Require all licensees or certificate holders to self-report lawsuits against or settlements with residential facility operators relating to the health and safety or human rights of residents and any criminal charges that may have been made relating to the health and safety or human rights of residents;

Require proof of contractual agreements or staff expertise to provide educational services, counseling services, psychological services, medical services, or any other services needed to serve the residents in accordance with the facility’s operational plan;

Modify the term of the license or certificate at any time during the term of the license or certificate based on a change in compliance; and

Disseminate to local governments, or post on the Department’s website, an accurate (updated weekly or monthly as necessary) list of licensed and operating group homes and other residential facilities for children by locality with information on services and identification of the lead licensure agency.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-331, 63.1-246, 63-291.1; 1966, c. 491; 1968, c. 578; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1975, c. 637; 1981, c. 487; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-249; 1989, c. 733; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2005, cc. 358, 471; 2006, cc. 168, 781; 2008, c. 873; 2015, c. 366.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 168, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Education, the Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the State Board of Juvenile Justice, and the Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2006, c. 781, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Education, Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], Board of Social Services, and the State Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2006, c. 781, cl. 3, provides: “That the Board of Education, Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services, Board of Social Services [now the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], and the State Board of Juvenile Justice shall also include in the emergency regulations required by the second enactment clause provisions to implement the requirements enacted by HB 2461 (2005) and SB 1304 (2005) [Acts 2005, cc. 358, 471].”

Acts 2008, c. 873, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the Board of Social Services, and the Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act no later than October 31, 2009.”

Acts 2008, c. 873, cl. 3, provides: “That the Standards for Interdepartmental Regulation of Children’s Residential Facilities (22 VAC 42-11-10 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until such time as each Board required to promulgate regulations pursuant to this act promulgates such regulations as required by this act. Upon promulgation of regulations by a Board as required by this act, the Standards for Interdepartmental Regulation of Children’s Residential Facilities shall cease to apply to facilities licensed and regulated by that Board.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 358 and 471 are identical, and added subsection designations and subsection A; in subsection B, added the second sentence in the first paragraph and substituted “Any more permanent” for “such” in the second paragraph; in subsection C, substituted “community group homes or other residential care” for “such”; and rewrote the last sentence as subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 168 added subsections E and F.

The 2006 amendment by c. 781 added subsections E and F [now G and H].

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 873, in subsection A, deleted “and in reducing and simplifying the regulations involved in the licensing or certification” following “certification responsibilities” in the first sentence and added the last sentence; added the last sentence in subsection C; substituted “licensed by the Department” for “for which the Department serves as lead agency” in subdivision H 1; and added subdivision H 6 and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 366 substituted “Office of Children’s Services” for “Office of Comprehensive Services” in subdivision H 1.

§ 66-25.
Collection of information concerning religious preferences by correctional facilities.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any correctional facility established pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 11 (§ 16.1-226 et seq.) of Title 16.1 may collect and disseminate information concerning the religious preferences and affiliations of persons committed to its custody. No person shall be required to indicate his religious preference or affiliation, and no dissemination of the information shall be made except to categories of persons designated by the person who has given his consent to such dissemination.

No consent given pursuant to this section shall be construed to allow any correctional facility established pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 11 (§ 16.1-226 et seq.) of Title 16.1 to disseminate to federal government authorities information concerning the religious preferences and affiliations of persons committed to its custody for the purpose of compiling a list, registry, or database of individuals based on religious affiliation, national origin, or ethnicity, unless such dissemination is specifically required by state or federal law.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-19.15:1; 1977, c. 506; 1982, c. 636, § 53.1-250; 1989, c. 733; 2019, c. 774.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 774 designated the existing provisions as subsection A and added subsection B.

§ 66-25.1.
Work programs.

The Director or his designee may enter into an agreement with a public or private entity for the operation of a work program for juveniles committed to the Department.

The primary purpose of such work program shall be the training of such juveniles, not the production of goods or the rendering of service by juveniles committed to the Department. Such work programs also shall not interfere with or impact a juvenile’s education program where the goal is achieving a high school diploma or its equivalent. The Board shall promulgate regulations governing the form and review process for proposed agreements.

Articles produced or manufactured and services provided by juveniles participating in such a work program may be purchased by any county, by any district of any county, city, or town and by any nonprofit organization, including volunteer emergency medical services agencies, fire departments, sheltered workshops and community service organizations. Such articles and services may also be bought, sold or acquired by exchange on the open market through the participating public or private entity.

Revenues received from the sale of articles, as provided in subsection C, shall be deposited into a special fund established in the state treasury. Such funds shall be expended to support work programs for juveniles committed to the Department.

History.

1993, cc. 460, 487; 1997, c. 639; 2011, c. 551; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 551, cl. 2, provides: “That the committee described in subsection A of §

66-25.1

of the Code of Virginia shall develop and submit to the Department of Juvenile Justice a plan to establish a network of businesses willing to employ juveniles released from the Department’s commitment.”

Acts 2011, c. 551, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2012.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 551, effective July 1, 2012, in subsection A, substituted the language beginning “a business that employs” through to the end for “the Office of the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, and the Office of the Secretary of Public Safety.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 101, are identical, and rewrote subsection A. Acts 2012 cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, also purported to amend subsection A by substituting “Department of Juvenile Justice’s Division of Education” for “Department of Correctional Education,” but the section was deleted by cl. 101.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, and in subsection C, inserted “by any” preceding “district” and substituted “emergency medical services agencies” for “lifesaving or first aid crews, rescue squads” following “volunteer.”

§ 66-25.1:1.
Juvenile academic and career training.

The Director or his designee shall assess, in accordance with criteria established pursuant to §

66-25.1:3

, whether a juvenile committed to the Department is an appropriate candidate for participation in a work release program, apprenticeship program, job enterprise program, or any other work experience opportunity located at or through the juvenile correctional center where the juvenile is placed.

History.

2005, c. 648.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 648, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Juvenile Justice is authorized to operate a pilot program in conformity with this act beginning July 1, 2005, and ending July 1, 2006, at one juvenile correctional center site.”

Acts 2005, c. 648, cl. 3, provides: “That the Department of Juvenile Justice shall submit a report on the implementation of the pilot program and this act to the House Committee on Militia, Police and Public Safety, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 15, 2005. The report shall provide an assessment on the implementation of the pilot program permitting a work and educational release program involving the temporary release of juveniles into the community in preparation for their transition from the Department of Juvenile Justice’s direct care to their home community.”

Acts 2005, c. 648, cl. 4, provides: “That the Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment. The regulations shall establish criteria for assessing a juvenile’s suitability for such programs as authorized by this act. Such criteria shall include a review of the juvenile’s offense history and behavior during commitment; the completion of an objective risk assessment of the juvenile’s likelihood to re-offend; and an assessment of the juvenile’s suitability for the particular community release program.”

Acts 2005, c. 648, cl. 5, provides: “That the second, third, and fourth enactments are effective on July 1, 2005, and the first enactment is effective July 1, 2006.”

§ 66-25.1:2.
Career training and technical education programs.

With such funds as are made available for this purpose, the Department shall provide juveniles committed to the Department with opportunities to work and to participate in career training or technical education programs operated by the Department.

The Department may develop appropriate interagency linkages with state and local agencies, public and private institutions of education and of higher education, labor and industry councils, the business community, rehabilitative services providers, and employment and guidance services to assist juveniles in acquiring necessary work habits, developing marketable skills, and identifying career goals through a broad range of career opportunities and mentoring and apprenticeship programs. In providing career-related programs, training, and services, the Department may consult and cooperate with the Virginia Employment Commission and the Department of Labor and Industry. Work training opportunities may include business, industrial, agricultural, highway maintenance and construction, and work release programs as hereafter specified in this article. In addition, juveniles may be employed to improve, repair, work on, or cultivate public property or buildings.

History.

2005, c. 648; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 648, cl. 2, provides: “That the Board of Juvenile Justice is authorized to operate a pilot program in conformity with this act beginning July 1, 2005, and ending July 1, 2006, at one juvenile correctional center site.”

Acts 2005, c. 648, cl. 3, provides: “That the Department of Juvenile Justice shall submit a report on the implementation of the pilot program and this act to the House Committee on Militia, Police and Public Safety, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 15, 2005. The report shall provide an assessment on the implementation of the pilot program permitting a work and educational release program involving the temporary release of juveniles into the community in preparation for their transition from the Department of Juvenile Justice’s direct care to their home community.”

Acts 2005, c. 648, cl. 4, provides: “That the Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment. The regulations shall establish criteria for assessing a juvenile’s suitability for such programs as authorized by this act. Such criteria shall include a review of the juvenile’s offense history and behavior during commitment; the completion of an objective risk assessment of the juvenile’s likelihood to re-offend; and an assessment of the juvenile’s suitability for the particular community release program.”

Acts 2005, c. 648, cl. 5, provides: “That the second, third, and fourth enactments are effective on July 1, 2005, and the first enactment is effective July 1, 2006.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 99, are identical, and deleted “or by the Department of Correctional Education in accordance with § 22.1-339 et seq.” following “operated by the Department” in subsection A; and deleted “in conjunction with the Department of Correctional Education” preceding “may consult” in the second sentence of subsection B.